Connecticut, session 2026, HB05047.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
That the sum of three hundred thousand dollars be appropriated to
the Department of Emergency Services and Public Protection, from the
General Fund, for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2027, for the New
Milford Police Department to maintain helicopters used for search and
rescue operations throughout the state.